Washington statutes.
RCW 39.26.250

Preferences—Purchase of goods and services from inmate work programs.

Any person, firm, or organization which makes any bid to provide any goods or any services to any state agency shall be granted a preference over other bidders if (1) the goods or services have been or will be produced or provided in whole or in part by an inmate work program of the department of corrections and (2) an amount equal to at least fifteen percent of the total bid amount has been paid or will be paid by the person, firm, or organization to inmates as wages. The preference provided under this section shall be equal to ten percent of the total bid amount.

[ 1981 c 136 s 15. Formerly RCW 43.19.535.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 136: See RCW 72.09.900.